Massachusetts, session 194th, H4035.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to Chapter 179, Section 84 of the Acts of 2022 An Act Driving
Clean Energy And Offshore Wind, and notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or
regulation to the contrary, the City of Somerville is authorized to adopt or amend general or
zoning ordinances that require new building construction or major renovation projects to be
fossil fuel-free, and enforce restrictions and prohibitions on new building construction and major
renovation projects that are not fossil fuel-free, including through the withholding or
conditioning of building permits.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1